Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
PART 2
CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES

Editor's note:

This part 2 was added with relocations in 2012. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this part 2, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

27-80-201. Short title.

This part 2 shall be known and may be cited as the "Colorado Licensing of Controlled Substances Act".

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1595, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-22-301 as it existed prior to 2012.

27-80-202. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly finds, determines, and declares that strict control of controlled substances within this state is necessary for the immediate and future preservation of the public peace, health, and safety and that the licensing, record-keeping, penalty, and other provisions contained in this part 2 are necessary for the achievement of such control.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1595, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-22-302 as it existed prior to 2012.

27-80-203. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

Repealed.

"Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the body of a patient.

"Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a person licensed or otherwise authorized under this part 2. "Agent" does not include a common or contract carrier, a public warehouseman, or an employee of a carrier or warehouseman.

"Bureau" means the drug enforcement administration, or its successor agency, of the United States department of justice.

"Compound" means to prepare, mix, assemble, package, or label a drug or device:

As the result of a practitioner's prescription drug order, chart order, or initiative, based on the relationship between the practitioner, patient, and pharmacist in the course of professional practice; or

For the purpose of, or as an incident to, teaching or chemical analysis and not for sale or dispensing.

"Compound" also includes the preparation of drugs or devices in anticipation of prescription drug orders based on routine, regularly observed prescribing patterns.

"Controlled substance" shall have the same meaning as in section 18-18-102 (5), C.R.S.

"Deliver" or "delivery" means actual, constructive, or attempted transfer of a controlled substance whether or not there is an agency relationship.

"Detoxification treatment" means a program for a short term of not more than three weeks for the administering or dispensing, in decreasing doses, of a controlled substance to a person with a substance use disorder while he or she is receiving appropriate supportive medical treatment, with the immediate goal being to render the person no longer dependent on the intake of any amount of a controlled substance.

"Device" means an instrument, apparatus, implement, machine, contrivance, implant, or similar or related article that is required under federal law to bear the label, "Caution: federal law requires dispensing by or on the order of a physician." "Device" also includes any component part of, or accessory or attachment to, any such article, whether or not the component part, accessory, or attachment is separately so labeled.

"Dispense" means to interpret, evaluate, and implement a prescription drug or controlled substances order or chart order, including the preparation of a drug or device for a patient or patient's agent in a suitable container appropriately labeled for subsequent administration to or use by a patient.

"Distribute" means to deliver a controlled substance other than by administering or dispensing.

"Drug" means any of the substances:

Recognized as drugs in the official United States pharmacopoeia, national formulary, or the official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or a supplement thereof;

Intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in individuals or animals;

Other than food, intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of individuals or animals; or

Intended for use as a component of any substance specified in subparagraph (I), (II), or (III) of this paragraph (a).

"Drug" does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.

"Maintenance treatment" means a program of more than six months' duration for the administering or dispensing of a controlled substance, approved for such use by federal law or regulation, to a person with a substance use disorder for the purpose of continuing his or her dependence upon a controlled substance in the course of conducting an authorized rehabilitation program for persons with substance use disorders, with a long-term goal of decreasing the person's controlled substance dependency and leading to his or her possible withdrawal.

"Marijuana" means all parts of the plant cannabis sativa L., whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, the resin extracted from any part of the plant, and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, its seeds, or its resin. It does not include fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, or sterilized seed of the plant that is incapable of germination, if these items exist apart from any other item defined as "marijuana" in this subsection (15). "Marijuana" does not include marijuana concentrate as defined in subsection (16) of this section.

"Marijuana concentrate" means hashish, tetrahydrocannabinols, or any alkaloid, salt, derivative, preparation, compound, or mixture, whether natural or synthesized, of tetrahydrocannabinols.

(16.5) "Opioid treatment program" means a treatment program licensed pursuant to this part 2 and certified as an opioid treatment program by the federal substance abuse and mental health services administration pursuant to the rules of the federal department of health and human services and the federal drug enforcement administration, to provide medication-assisted treatment for people diagnosed with an opioid-use disorder.

"Peace officer" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 16-2.5-101, C.R.S.

"Person" means any individual, government, governmental subdivision, agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, corporation, association, institution, or other legal entity.

"Peyote" means all parts of the plant presently classified botanically as lophophora williamsii lemaire, whether growing or not, the seeds thereof, any extraction from any part of such plant, and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of such plant or its seeds or extracts.

"Practitioner" means a person authorized by law to prescribe any drug or device, acting within the scope of such authority.

"Prescription drug" means a drug that, prior to being dispensed or delivered, is required to be labeled with the following statement: "Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without a prescription.", "Rx only", or "Caution: Federal law restricts this drug to use by or on the order of a licensed veterinarian."

"Production" or "produces" means the manufacturing, planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.

Repealed.

(23.3) "Substance use disorder" means a physical or psychological dependence on a controlled substance that develops following the use of the controlled substance on a periodic or continuing basis and is demonstrated by appropriate observation and tests by a person licensed to practice medicine pursuant to article 240 of title 12.

(23.5) "Substance use disorder treatment program" means a program licensed pursuant to this part 2 for the detoxification, withdrawal, or maintenance treatment of a person with a substance use disorder. "Substance use disorder treatment program" includes an opioid treatment program.

"Tetrahydrocannabinols" means synthetic equivalents of the substances contained in the plant, or in the resinous extractives of, cannabis, sp., or synthetic substances, derivatives, and their isomers with similar chemical structure and pharmacological activity, such as the following:

1cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers;

6cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers;

3,4cis or trans tetrahydrocannabinol, and their optical isomers.

Since the nomenclature of the substances listed in paragraph (a) of this subsection (24) is not internationally standardized, compounds of these structures, regardless of the numerical designation of atomic positions, are included in this definition.

"Withdrawal treatment" means a program for an intermediate term, of more than three weeks but less than six months, for the administering or dispensing, in decreasing doses, of a controlled substance, approved for such use by federal law or regulation, to a person with a substance use disorder while receiving rehabilitative measures as indicated, with the immediate goal being to render the person with the substance use disorder no longer dependent on the intake of any amount of a controlled substance.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1596, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(1) and (2) repealed, (9), (14), and (25) amended, and (23.3) and (23.5) added, (SB 17-242), ch. 266, p. 1360, § 263, effective May 25.

L. 2019:

(3), (6)(a)(II), and (23.5) amended, (16.5) added, and (23) repealed, (SB 19-219), ch. 277, p. 2613, § 2, effective August 2; (23.3) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1714, § 201, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-22-303 and § 12-22-102 as they existed prior to 2012.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-80-204. License required - controlled substances - repeal.

In accordance with part 3 of article 18 of title 18, a substance use disorder treatment program that compounds, administers, or dispenses a controlled substance shall annually obtain a license issued by the BHA for each place of business or professional practice located in this state.

This subsection (1) is repealed, effective September 1, 2026.

Prior to the repeal, the department of regulatory agencies shall review the licensing functions of the BHA as provided in section 24-34-104. In conducting the review, the department of regulatory agencies shall consider whether the licensing pursuant to this subsection (1) should be combined with the licensing of any other substance use disorder treatment programs by the department.

Persons licensed as required under this part 2, or otherwise licensed as required by federal law, may possess, distribute, dispense, or administer controlled substances only to the extent authorized by their licenses and in conformity with the provisions of this part 2 and with article 18 of title 18.

An employee of a facility, as defined in section 25-1.5-301, who is administering and monitoring medications to persons under the care or jurisdiction of the facility pursuant to part 3 of article 1.5 of title 25 need not be licensed by the BHA to lawfully possess controlled substances under this part 2.

A person who is required to be but is not yet licensed may apply for a license at any time. A person who is required to be licensed under this part 2 shall not engage in any activity for which a license is required until the BHA grants the person's application and issues a license to the person.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1601, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(1)(b)(I) amended, (HB 14-1173), ch. 291, p. 1191, § 2, effective May 31.

L. 2017:

(1)(a) and (1)(b)(II) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1361, § 267, effective May 25.

L. 2019:

(1)(b)(I) and (2) amended and (5) repealed, (SB 19-219), ch. 277, p. 2614, § 3, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

(1)(a), (1)(b)(II), (3) and (4) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1564, § 164, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-22-304 as it existed prior to 2012.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-80-205. Issuance of license - fees.

The BHA, as provided in section 27-80-204 (1), shall issue the appropriate license to each substance use disorder treatment program meeting all the requirements of this part 2 unless it determines that the issuance of the license would be inconsistent with the public interest. In determining the public interest, the BHA shall consider the following factors:

Maintenance of effective controls against diversion of controlled substances into illegitimate medical, scientific, or industrial channels;

Compliance with applicable state and local laws;

Any conviction of the applicant under any federal or state law relating to a controlled substance;

Past experience in the manufacture or distribution of controlled substances and the existence in the applicant's establishment of effective controls against diversion;

Any false or fraudulent information in an application filed under this part 2;

Suspension or revocation of the applicant's federal registration to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance as authorized by federal law; and

Any other factors relevant to and consistent with the public peace, health, and safety.

Issuance of a license under subsection (1) of this section does not entitle a licensee to distribute or professionally use controlled substances beyond the scope of the licensee's federal registration.

Repealed.

The BHA may administratively set initial and annual license fees for substance use disorder treatment programs to approximate the direct and indirect costs of the program.

The BHA shall transmit the fees collected pursuant to this section to the state treasurer for deposit in the controlled substances program fund created in section 27-80-206.

Any person who is licensed may apply for license renewal not more than sixty days before the expiration date of the license.

The United States, the state of Colorado, or any political subdivision of the state is not required to pay any license fee required by this part 2.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1602, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(3)(a)(I) repealed and (3)(a.5) added, (HB 14-1173), ch. 291, p. 1192, § 5, effective May 31.

L. 2017:

IP(1) and (3)(a.5) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1361, § 268, effective May 25.

L. 2019:

IP(1) amended and (3)(a) repealed, (SB 19-219), ch. 277, p. 2614, § 4, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

IP(1), (3)(a.5), and (3)(b) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1564, § 165, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-22-305 as it existed prior to 2012.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-80-206. Controlled substances program fund - disposition of fees.

There is created in the state treasury the controlled substances program fund. The BHA shall transmit all money it collects pursuant to this part 2 to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money to the controlled substances program fund. The general assembly shall annually appropriate money from the controlled substances program fund to the BHA for the purposes authorized by this part 2. All money credited to the controlled substances program fund and any interest earned on the fund remains in the fund and does not revert to the general fund or any other fund at the end of any fiscal year.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1604, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1564, § 166, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-22-306 as it existed prior to 2012.

27-80-207. Qualifications for license.

An applicant for a license under this part 2 shall have adequate and proper facilities for the handling and storage of controlled substances and shall maintain proper control over the controlled substances to ensure the controlled substances are not illegally dispensed or distributed.

Repealed.

The BHA shall not grant a license to a person who has been convicted within the last two years of a willful violation of this part 2 or any other state or federal law regulating controlled substances.

Except for fees, compliance by a registrant with the provisions of the federal law respecting registration entitles the registrant to be licensed under this part 2.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1604, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(2) repealed, (SB 19-219), ch. 277, p. 2615, § 5, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

(3) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1565, § 167, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-22-307 as it existed prior to 2012.

27-80-208. Denial, revocation, or suspension of license - other disciplinary actions - notice.

The BHA may deny, suspend, or revoke a license issued under this part 2 pursuant to article 4 of title 24, or take other disciplinary action as set forth in subsection (2.5) of this section, at the BHA's discretion, upon a finding that the licensee:

Has furnished false or fraudulent information in an application filed under this part 2;

Has been convicted of, or has had accepted by a court a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to, a felony under any state or federal law relating to a controlled substance;

Has had his or her federal registration to manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance suspended or revoked; or

Has violated any provision of this part 2 or the rules of the BHA or of the state board of human services created in section 26-1-107.

The BHA may limit revocation or suspension of a license to the particular controlled substance that was the basis for revocation or suspension.

(2.5) If the BHA determines that a licensee has committed an act that would authorize the BHA to deny, revoke, or suspend a license, the BHA may, at its discretion, impose other disciplinary actions that may include, but need not be limited to, a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars, probation, or stipulation.

If the BHA suspends or revokes a license, the BHA may place all controlled substances owned or possessed by the licensee at the time of the suspension or on the effective date of the revocation order under seal. The BHA may not dispose of substances under seal until the time for making an appeal has elapsed or until all appeals have been concluded, unless a court orders otherwise or orders the sale of any perishable controlled substances and the deposit of the proceeds with the court. When a revocation order becomes final, all controlled substances may be forfeited to the state.

The BHA shall promptly notify the bureau and the appropriate professional licensing agency, if any, of all charges and the final disposition of the charges, and of all forfeitures of a controlled substance.

On or before July 1, 2020, the BHA shall develop and implement a formal, simple, accurate, and objective system to track and categorize complaints made against a licensee and disciplinary action taken pursuant to this part 2.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1604, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

IP(1) amended and (2.5) added, (HB 14-1173), ch. 291, p. 1192, § 3, effective May 31.

L. 2019:

IP(1) and (1)(c) amended and (5) added, (SB 19-219), ch. 277, p. 2615, § 6, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

IP(1), (1)(d), (2), (2.5), (3), (4), and (5)(a) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1565, § 168, effective July 1.

27-80-209. Exemptions.

The provisions of section 18-18-414, C.R.S., do not apply to:

Agents of persons licensed under this part 2 or under part 3 of article 18 of title 18, C.R.S., acting within the provisions of their licenses; or

Officers or employees of appropriate agencies of federal, state, or local governments acting pursuant to their official duties.

All combination drugs that are exempted by regulation of the attorney general of the United States department of justice, pursuant to section 1006 (b) of Public Law 91-513 (84 Stat. 1236), known as the "Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention and Control Act of 1970", on or after July 1, 1981, are exempt from this part 2 and part 3 of article 18 of title 18, C.R.S.

This part 2 does not apply to peyote if it is used in religious ceremonies of any bona fide religious organization.

Section 27-80-210 does not apply to a practitioner authorized to prescribe any controlled substance that is listed in schedules III, IV, or V of part 2 of article 18 of title 18, C.R.S., and that is manufactured, received, or dispensed by the practitioner in the course of his or her professional practice, unless:

The practitioner dispenses, other than by direct administration, a schedule III, IV, or V controlled substance to his or her patients, and the practitioner charges the patients either separately or together with charges for other professional services; or

The practitioner regularly engages in dispensing a schedule III, IV, or V controlled substance to his or her patients.

The exemptions set forth in this section are available as a defense to any person accused of violating section 18-18-414, C.R.S.

The state is not required to negate any exemption or exception in this part 2 or in part 3 or 4 of article 18 of title 18, C.R.S., in any complaint, information, indictment, or other pleading or in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding under this part 2 or under part 4 of article 18 of title 18, C.R.S. The burden of proving an exemption or exception is upon the person claiming the exemption or exception.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1605, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-22-317 as it existed prior to 2012.

27-80-210. Records to be kept - order forms.

Each person licensed or otherwise authorized under this part 2 or other laws of this state to manufacture, purchase, distribute, dispense, administer, store, or otherwise handle controlled substances shall keep and maintain separate detailed and accurate records and inventories relating to controlled substances and retain the records and inventories for a period of two years after the respective dates of the transactions as shown on the records and inventories.

The record of any controlled substance distributed, administered, dispensed, or otherwise used must show the date the controlled substance was distributed, administered, dispensed, used, or otherwise disposed of, the name and address of the person to whom or for whose use the controlled substance was distributed, administered, dispensed, used, or otherwise disposed of, and the kind and quantity of the controlled substance.

A person who maintains a record required by federal law that contains substantially the same information as set forth in subsections (1) and (2) of this section is deemed to comply with the record-keeping requirements of this part 2.

A person required to maintain records pursuant to this section shall keep a record of any controlled substance lost, destroyed, or stolen, the kind and quantity of the controlled substance, and the date of the loss, destruction, or theft.

A person licensed or otherwise authorized under this part 2 or other laws of this state shall distribute, administer, dispense, use, or otherwise dispose of controlled substances listed in schedule I or II of part 2 of article 18 of title 18, C.R.S., only pursuant to an order form. Compliance with the provisions of federal law respecting order forms is deemed compliance with this section.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1606, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-22-318 as it existed prior to 2012.

27-80-211. Enforcement and cooperation.

Each peace officer and district attorney in this state shall enforce this part 2 and shall cooperate with all agencies charged with the enforcement of the laws of this state, all other states, and the United States relating to controlled substances.

The BHA shall cooperate with all agencies charged with the enforcement of the laws of this state, all other states, and the United States relating to controlled substances. To this end, the BHA shall:

Arrange for the exchange of information among governmental officials concerning the use and abuse of controlled substances;

Cooperate with the bureau and with local, state, and other federal agencies by maintaining a centralized unit to accept, catalogue, file, and collect statistics, including records of dependent and other controlled substance law offenders within the state, and make the information available for federal, state, and local law enforcement or regulatory purposes. The BHA shall not furnish the name or identity of a patient whose identity could not be obtained under section 27-80-212.

Respond to referrals, complaints, or other information received regarding possible violations and, upon notification of the appropriate licensing authority, if applicable, and upon a written finding by the commissioner that probable cause exists to believe that there is illegal distribution or dispensing of controlled substances, to make any inspections, investigations, and reports that may be necessary to determine compliance with this part 2 by all licensed or otherwise authorized individuals who handle controlled substances;

Cooperate with and make information available to appropriate state licensing and registration boards regarding any violations of this part 2 by persons licensed or registered by the boards;

Enter into contracts and encourage and conduct educational and research activities designed to prevent and determine misuse and abuse of controlled substances.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1607, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 19-219), ch. 277, p. 2615, § 7, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

IP(2), (2)(b), and (2)(c) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1566, § 169, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-22-319 as it existed prior to 2012.

27-80-212. Records confidential.

Prescriptions, orders, and records required by this part 2 and stocks of controlled substances are open for inspection only to federal, state, county, and municipal officers whose duty it is to enforce the laws of this state or of the United States relating to controlled substances or the regulation of practitioners. No officer having knowledge, by virtue of his or her office, of a prescription, order, or record shall divulge his or her knowledge, except in connection with a prosecution or proceeding in court or before a licensing or registration board or officer to which prosecution or proceeding the person to whom the prescriptions, orders, or records relate is a party.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1607, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-22-320 as it existed prior to 2012.

27-80-213. Rules - policies.

The BHA shall update rules and promulgate new rules, as necessary and pursuant to article 4 of title 24, to implement this part 2. The BHA shall make the rules available to the public on its website.

The BHA shall promulgate rules, in accordance with article 4 of title 24, for the conduct of detoxification treatment, maintenance treatment, and withdrawal treatment programs for substance use disorders related to controlled substances.

The BHA shall develop a policy that separates the administration of this part 2 from the administration of article 81 of this title 27. The policy must ensure that the BHA's performance of its duties pursuant to this part 2 does not interfere with the performance of its duties as required by article 81 of this title 27.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1608, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1362, § 269, effective May 25.

L. 2019:

(2) amended and (3) added, (SB 19-219), ch. 277, p. 2616, § 8, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1566, § 170, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-22-321 and § 12-22-322 as they existed prior to 2012.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-80-214. Defenses.

The common law defense known as the "procuring agent defense" is not a defense to any crime in this part 2 or in title 18, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire part added with relocations, (SB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1608, § 5, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-22-324 as it existed prior to 2012.

27-80-215. Central registry - registration required - notice - repeal.

On or before July 1, 2020, the BHA shall develop or procure a secure online central registry, referred to in this section as the "registry", to register patients treated in a substance use disorder treatment program.

The BHA shall operate and maintain the registry or enter into an agreement with a third party to operate and maintain the registry on its behalf.

Each opioid treatment program shall register and maintain an account with the registry.

Repealed.

In order to prevent simultaneous enrollment of a patient in more than one opioid treatment program, each opioid treatment program shall fully participate in the registry, including submitting a query to the registry for each patient and entering in patient information as required by this part 2 and BHA rule.
(2) (a) (I) In order to prevent simultaneous enrollment of a patient in more than one opioid treatment program, each opioid treatment program shall fully participate in the registry, including submitting a query to the registry for each patient and entering in patient information as required by this part 2 and BHA rule.

For each patient, the entry into the registry must include the patient's name, the opioid treatment program providing treatment to the patient, and any information the BHA deems necessary to further the goals of this part 2.

Any person seeking treatment from an opioid treatment program must provide the program with any information required by this section and authorize the program to query the registry. A program may not query or enter any information into the registry without authorization from the patient.

The BHA shall establish the method for opioid treatment programs to enter information into the registry and query the registry for information concerning prospective patients.

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2026.

Prior to the repeal, the department of regulatory agencies shall review the registration functions of the BHA as provided in section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-219), ch. 277, p. 2616, § 9, effective August 2.

L. 2022:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (2)(a)(I), (2)(a)(II), (2)(b), and (3)(b) amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1566, § 171, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1)(d)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (1)(d), effective July 1, 2021. (See L. 2019, p. 2616.)

27-80-216. Policy verifying identity.

The BHA shall establish a policy on how a substance use disorder treatment program must verify the identity of individuals initiating into detoxification, withdrawal, or maintenance treatment for a substance use disorder. The BHA policy must include verification requirements for individuals without identification and individuals experiencing homelessness.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-227), ch. 273, p. 2583, § 13, effective May 23.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1278), ch. 222, p. 1567, § 172, effective July 1.